Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201858-822
Authority; perpetual succession; bylaws.

The
authority shall have perpetual succession as a body politic and corporate
and may adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of
its business.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 19;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2919;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 19;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1719;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 22.